Utah statutes.
17-28-10.   Vacancies in civil service positions.

Any vacancy occurring in any county fire civil service position in any county fire department subject to this chapter shall be filled by an employee of the department having a lesser, equal, or superior position than that in which the vacancy occurs if that employee submits himself to examination for the position, is found qualified, and is certified by the County Fire Civil Service executive director as provided in this chapter.

